Hawaii, session 2025, HB1197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that a 2019 ACLU report showed that five thousand one hundred people are incarcerated in Hawaii's prisons and jails.  Alarmingly, the current system is only meant to house about three thousand five hundred people resulting in severe overcrowding. In 2019, Hawaii admitted an average of more than one thousand thirty-seven prisoners per month to the state correctional system.  It is estimated that the cost of incarceration per adult prisoner is nearly eighty thousand dollars per year.  These figures illustrate a strain upon the State's resources as many of those inmates suffer from mental illnesses and require specialized care that the current facilities are not structured to support.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's prison system is in dire need of reform particularly in its delivery of mental health care services to inmates across facilities statewide. In a report to the legislature, the department of corrections and rehabilitation outlined a plan in partnership with the University of Hawaii John A. Burns School of Medicine (JABSOM) and the Queen's Health Systems (QHS), to provide opportunities for JABSOM residents to complete clinical rotations in psychiatry at the Oahu Community Correctional Center.  In particular, the report highlighted the need for additional funding to match JABSOM and QHS cost increases in order to continue these contractual agreements.  Further, the department is subject to increased costs associated with participation in the Hawaii Psychology Internship Consortium (HIPIC). Additional resource requirements are also needed to expand APA accredited clinical psychology internship opportunities within the correctional facilities.  The legislature finds that by facilitating these student education partnerships through various funding mechanisms as determined by the department, the State may begin to see necessary prison reform. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Authorize the department of corrections and rehabilitation the ability to prioritize the utilization of student education partnerships to expand clinical psychologists in correctional facilities throughout the State; and (2)  Provide additional long-term funding to the department to expand its clinical psychology training programs. SECTION 2.  Section 353-13.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[§353-13.3]  Mental health care.  The department shall be responsible for providing mental health services in community correctional centers and shall utilize student education partnerships to expand clinical psychologists and mental health care providers in correctional facilities throughout the State." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $         or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for supporting and expanding clinical psychology training programs within the department. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________